Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.343.300

Directors—Terms—Number.

The governing board of a school district shall be known as the board of directors of the district.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, as in RCW 29A.04.340, each member of a board of directors shall be elected by ballot by the registered voters of the school district and shall hold office for a term of four years and until a successor is elected and qualified. Terms of school directors shall be staggered, and insofar as possible, not more than a majority of one shall be elected to full terms at any regular election. In case a member or members of a board of directors are to be elected to fill an unexpired term or terms, the ballot shall specify the term for which each such member is to be elected.

Except for a school district of the first class having within its boundaries a city with a population of four hundred thousand people or more which shall have a board of directors of seven members, the board of directors of every school district of the first class or school district of the second class shall consist of five members.

[ 2009 c 107 s 1; 1991 c 363 s 20; 1980 c 35 s 1; 1980 c 47 s 1. Prior: 1979 ex.s. c 183 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 126 s 4; 1975 c 43 s 5; 1973 2nd ex.s. c 21 s 1; 1969 c 131 s 8; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.312; prior: 1957 c 67 s 1; 1955 c 55 s 11; 1947 c 266 s 10; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4693-29; prior: 1909 pp 289, 290 ss 1,2; RRS ss 4790, 4791. Formerly RCW 28A.315.450, 28A.57.312, 28.57.338, 28.58.080.]

NOTES:

Retroactive application—2009 c 107 ss 1-4: "Sections 1 through 4 of this act are retroactive and shall be applied from July 1, 2004, the date that RCW 29.13.060 was inadvertently repealed as part of a reorganization and recodification of the statutes on elections." [ 2009 c 107 s 6.]

Effective date—2009 c 107: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 16, 2009]." [ 2009 c 107 s 7.]

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Severability—1980 c 35: "If any provision of this amendatory act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1980 c 35 s 10.]

Severability—1980 c 47: "If any provision of this amendatory act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1980 c 47 s 5.]

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 183: See notes following RCW 28A.343.020.

Purpose—1979 ex.s. c 126: See RCW 29A.60.280(1).

Effective date—Severability—1975 c 43: See notes following RCW 28A.535.050.